Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Heritage Land Conservation

146.550.
Definitions for KRS 146.550 to 146.570.

As used in KRS 146.550 to 146.570:

“Wetlands” means land that has a predominance of hydric soils and is inundated or saturated by surface or groundwater at a frequency and duration sufficient to support, and that under normal circumstances does support, a prevalence of hydrophytic vegetation typically adapted for life in saturated soil conditions;

“Hydric soils” means soils that, in their undrained condition, are saturated, flooded, or ponded long enough during the growing season to develop an anaerobic condition that supports the growth and regeneration of hydrophytic vegetation;

“Hydrophytic vegetation” means a plant growing in water or a substrate that is at least periodically deficient of oxygen during the growing season as a result of excess water content;

“Office” means the Office of Kentucky Nature Preserves; and

“Cabinet” means the Energy and Environment Cabinet.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 446, § 3, effective July 13, 1990; 2018 ch. 29, § 42, effective July 14, 2018.

146.555.
Legislative finding.

The General Assembly hereby recognizes the benefit to the citizens of Kentucky of the acquisition and maintenance of certain lands for use as state parks, recreation areas, state forests, nature preserves, wildlife management areas, and wetlands. It is, therefore, in the public interest to promote and fund the conservation of such areas.

History.
Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 446, § 1, effective July 13, 1990.

146.560.
Kentucky Heritage Land Conservation Fund Board.

There is hereby established a Kentucky Heritage Land Conservation Fund Board, referred to hereafter as “the board,” which shall administer the Kentucky Heritage Land Conservation fund established in KRS 146.570 and shall review and approve all grants payable from the fund. The board shall consist of the following members:

The commissioner of the Department of Parks or a designee;

The executive director of the Office of Kentucky Nature Preserves or a designee;

The commissioner of the Department for Natural Resources or a designee;

The commissioner of the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources or a designee;

One (1) person appointed by the Governor, from two (2) persons nominated by the League of Kentucky Sportsmen;

One (1) person appointed by the Governor, from two (2) persons recognized for their expertise in natural resource issues and nominated by the Kentucky Academy of Sciences;

One (1) person appointed by the Governor, from three (3) persons nominated, one (1) by the Kentucky Farm Bureau, one (1) by the Commissioner of the Department of Agriculture, and one (1) by the Kentucky Association of Conservation Districts;

One (1) person appointed by the Governor, from four (4) persons nominated, one (1) by the Kentucky Audubon Council, one (1) by the Cumberland Chapter of the Sierra Club, one (1) by the Kentucky Chapter of the Nature Conservancy, and one (1) by the Kentucky Conservation Committee; and

One (1) person appointed by the Governor with at least five (5) years of experience in natural resources land acquisition. The board shall receive staff support from the Office of Kentucky Nature Preserves. Board members shall serve terms of three (3) years and they may be reappointed. A vacancy in an unexpired term shall be filled for the unexpired portion of the term in the same manner as the original appointment to that term. The Governor shall appoint a chairperson for the board, selected from seated members of the board.

The cabinet may promulgate upon recommendation of the board in accordance with the provisions of KRS Chapter 13A administrative regulations as are deemed necessary for application for funds from the agencies and private, nonprofit land trust organizations identified in KRS 146.570, review and approval of proposed projects, and review and approval of grants. Grants shall be made in amounts, for purposes, and to the agencies and private, nonprofit land trust organizations identified in KRS 146.570 as meet the priorities for acquisition which are:

Natural areas that possess unique features such as habitat for rare and endangered species;

Areas important to migratory birds;

Areas that perform important natural functions that are subject to alteration or loss; or

Areas to be preserved in their natural state for public use, outdoor recreation and education. The cabinet may promulgate administrative regulations, upon recommendation of the board and in accordance with the provisions of KRS Chapter 13A, on acquisition based on these priorities and property costs seeking to maximize the greatest public benefit by taking advantage of those priority areas available below fair market value and where public or private funds are available on a matching basis. Additionally, private, nonprofit land trust organizations, in order to be eligible to receive grants, shall match dollar-for-dollar any funds approved by the board. The board shall expend the whole or any part of the principal and interest as needed. KRS 146.550 to 146.570 shall not allow the use of condemnation powers and shall only allow acquisition of land from willing sellers.

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 446, § 2, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 328, § 1, effective July 15, 1994; 1998, ch. 67, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2010, ch. 24, § 134, effective July 15, 2010; 2013, ch. 62, § 1, effective June 25, 2013; 2018 ch. 29, § 43, effective July 14, 2018.

146.565.
Acquisition of natural areas and wetlands.

Agencies identified in KRS 146.570 may acquire natural areas and wetlands as defined in KRS 146.550 and shall acquire any access and buffer land deemed necessary by the Kentucky Heritage Land Conservation Fund Board established by KRS 146.560. Acquisition of land and expenditure of funds using proceeds provided by KRS 146.570 shall be approved by the board prior to such action.

History.
Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 446, § 4, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 328, § 2, effective July 15, 1994.

146.570.
Kentucky Heritage Land Conservation fund.

There is hereby established in the State Treasury a fund entitled “Kentucky Heritage Land Conservation fund.” The fund shall primarily receive state appropriations, gifts, grants, federal funds, and tax receipts. The fund shall be disbursed by the State Treasurer upon the warrant of the secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet. Moneys in the fund not expended at the end of a fiscal year shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year, and the fund shall not lapse. Moneys in the fund shall be invested in accordance with administrative regulations developed by the State Investment Commission in accordance with KRS 42.525. Interest earnings shall accrue to the fund.

The fund shall be attached for administrative, budgeting, and capital planning and reporting purposes to the Office of Kentucky Nature Preserves. Land acquisitions shall be authorized by the General Assembly and reported to the Capital Projects and Bond Oversight Committee in accordance with KRS 45.750 to 45.800. Allocation of moneys as approved by the board for management of the lands shall be appropriated to each separate agency as part of its operating budget.

Moneys in the fund shall be used exclusively for the purposes of acquisition and management of lands as defined in KRS 146.560 and for administration of the fund program by the office. Each recipient of moneys shall develop and implement a resource management plan for each tract acquired, and shall allocate some moneys received for management of lands acquired as directed by the board. Lands acquired shall be maintained in perpetuity for the purposes set out in KRS 146.560.

Moneys in the fund shall be allocated as follows:

The Department of Parks shall receive ten percent (10%);

The Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources shall receive ten percent (10%);

The Energy and Environment Cabinet, Division of Forestry, shall receive ten percent (10%);

Ten percent (10%) shall be allocated for the Wild Rivers System established by the Kentucky Wild Rivers Act, KRS 146.200 to 146.360, and any administrative regulations promulgated pursuant thereto;

The Office of Kentucky Nature Preserves shall receive ten percent (10%); and

The board shall receive the remaining fifty percent (50%), for allocation to private, nonprofit land trust organizations, state agencies, local governments, and state colleges and universities. Any funds expended under this paragraph to private, nonprofit land trust organizations shall be matched dollar-for-dollar as required in KRS 146.560(2).

HISTORY:
Enact. Acts 1990, ch. 446, § 5, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 328, § 3, effective July 15, 1994; 2010, ch. 24, § 135, effective July 15, 2010; 2013, ch. 62, § 2, effective June 25, 2013; 2018 ch. 29, § 44, effective July 14, 2018.